Maryland, session 2025, SB0376.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–1408.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0376*

SENATE BILL 376
(a) (1) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, the Department shall make a
site visit and conduct a full survey of each licensed nursing home at least once per calendar
year.
(2) Unless otherwise required by federal law, all surveys shall be
unannounced.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Department shall
initiate an investigation of a nursing home complaint alleging actual harm within 10
business days after receiving the complaint.
(2) If the Department receives a complaint against a nursing home alleging
immediate jeopardy to a resident, the Department:
(i) Shall make every effort to investigate the complaint within 24
hours after receiving the complaint; and
(ii) Shall investigate the complaint not later than 48 hours after
receiving the complaint.
(c) If ownership of a licensed nursing home is transferred to a person that does
not own or operate another nursing home in the State at the time of the transfer, the
Department shall conduct:
(1) The first full survey of the licensed nursing home as required under
subsection (a) of this section within 3 months after the date of transfer; and
(2) An unannounced, on–site follow–up survey of the licensed nursing
home that covers any deficiencies noted in the full survey within 120 days after the full
survey was completed.
(D) (1) ON REQUEST OF A COUNTY, THE SECRETARY SHALL DELEGATE TO
THE COUNTY THE AUTHORITY TO CONDUCT SITE VISITS AND FULL SURVEYS AND
COMPLAINT INVESTIGATIONS OF NURSING HOMES AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(2) (I) WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A REQUEST FROM A
COUNTY, THE SECRETARY SHALL EXECUTE A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING
WITH THE COUNTY TO DELEGATE THE AUTHORITY TO CONDUCT SURVEYS AND
COMPLAINT INVESTIGATIONS OF NURSING HOMES AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(II) THE MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING SHALL BE
MODELED ON THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STANDARD
MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING INTRA–AGENCY/INTERGOVERNMENTAL

SENATE BILL 376 3
AGREEMENT, ENTITLED NURSING HOME FACILITIES, THAT EXISTED BETWEEN THE
DEPARTMENT AND MONTGOMERY COUNTY ON JULY 1, 2019.
(2) (3) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE COUNTY SHALL EQUALLY
SHARE THE COSTS OF CONDUCTING SITE VISITS AND FULL SURVEYS DELEGATED BY
THE SECRETARY UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October July 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.